src/fst/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particles
    a+Part+Voc:a        #   "O" ;

    á+Part+Imp:á        #   "imperative particle" ;
    a+Part+Imp:a        #   "imperative particle" ;

    ai+Intj:ai          #   "ah, alas" ;
    
    cé+Part:cé          #   "maybe" ;
    ce+Part:ce          #   "maybe" ;

    i+Det+Art+Def:i     #   "the" ;
    nai+Part+Jus        #   "may" ;
